Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1234.
do enact as follows:AB1234,11Section 1. 115.29 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1234,2,72115.29 (7) Teen pregnancy prevention. Apply for all federal funds 3allocated for providing instruction in any of the subjects identified in s. 118.019 4evidence-based teen pregnancy prevention programs that meet criteria for program 5effectiveness, including at least one favored outcome from increased contraceptive 6use or reduced sexual activity, number of sexual partners, sexually transmitted 7infections, or pregnancy rates.AB1234,28Section 2. 118.019 (1) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB1234,2,149118.019 (1) Purpose. The purpose of this section is to ensure that all school 10boards provide pupils in their districts with age-appropriate instruction in human 11growth and development. The instruction should support and enhance 12communication between pupils and their parents and provide pupils with the 13knowledge, skills, and support necessary to make healthy decisions now and 14throughout their lifetimes and to make responsible decisions about sexual behavior.AB1234,315Section 3. 118.019 (1m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1234,2,1916118.019 (1m) (a) “Age-appropriate” means suitable to a particular age group 17of pupils based on their the developing cognitive and emotional capacity of and 18consistent with adolescent development and community standards behaviors 19typical for the age group.AB1234,420Section 4. 118.019 (1m) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 118.019 (1m) (b) 21(intro.) and amended to read:AB1234,3,21118.019 (1m) (b) (intro.) “Medically accurate information” means information 2that is scientifically-based and published, where all of the following:AB1234,3,332. When appropriate, published in peer-reviewed journals and textbooks.AB1234,54Section 5. 118.019 (1m) (b) 1. and 3. of the statutes are created to read:AB1234,3,65118.019 (1m) (b) 1. Supported by the weight of research conducted in 6compliance with accepted scientific methods.AB1234,3,973. Recognized as accurate by relevant leading professional organizations or 8agencies, such as the American Medical Association, the American Public Health 9Association, or the American Academy of Pediatrics.AB1234,610Section 6. 118.019 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1234,3,1911118.019 (2) Subjects. (intro.) A school board may provide an instructional 12program in human growth and development in grades kindergarten to 12. If the 13school board elects to provide an instructional program under this section, when 14the school board establishes the curriculum for the instructional program, the 15school board shall make determinations as to whether and, if so, for what subjects 16covered in the curriculum the pupils shall be separated by gender. If an a school 17board elects to provide an instructional program is provided, the school board shall 18develop the instructional program to include the subjects under sub. (2r) and to do 19all of the following instructional program is recommended:AB1234,720Section 7. 118.019 (2) (a) 1. and 2. of the statutes are amended to read:AB1234,3,2321118.019 (2) (a) 1. The importance of communication about sexuality between 22the pupil and the pupil’s parents or, guardians, or other family members about 23sexuality and decision-making about sexual behavior.AB1234,4,212. Reproductive and sexual anatomy and physiology, including biological, 2psychosocial, and emotional, and intellectual changes that accompany maturation.AB1234,83Section 8. 118.019 (2) (a) 3., 3m. and 4. of the statutes are created to read:AB1234,4,54118.019 (2) (a) 3. Puberty and adolescent development, human reproduction, 5including pregnancy and child birth, parenting, and body image.AB1234,4,763m. Gender, gender expression, gender identity, and the harm of gender 7stereotypes.AB1234,4,1284. The skills needed to make responsible decisions about sexuality and sexual 9behavior throughout the pupil’s life, including the ability to recognize and unlearn 10behaviors that include inappropriate verbal, physical, and sexual advances, how to 11use nonviolent communication and deescalate conflict, and how to identify and 12report conduct to a trusted adult.AB1234,913Section 9. 118.019 (2) (a) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1234,4,1914118.019 (2) (a) 5. The benefits of and reasons for abstaining from sexual 15activity. Instruction under this subdivision shall stress the value of abstinence as 16the only most reliable way to prevent pregnancy and sexually transmitted 17infections, and shall identify the skills necessary to remain abstinent. Abstinence 18may not be taught in lieu of providing other materials and instruction on 19contraceptives and disease prevention.AB1234,1020Section 10. 118.019 (2) (a) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB1234,5,221118.019 (2) (a) 6. The health benefits, side effects, and proper use of 22contraceptives and barrier methods approved by the federal food and drug 1administration to prevent pregnancy and barrier methods approved by the federal 2food and drug administration to prevent sexually transmitted infections.AB1234,113Section 11. 118.019 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is repealed and recreated to 4read:AB1234,5,65118.019 (2) (a) 10. Sexual orientation, including romantic and sexual 6attraction.AB1234,127Section 12. 118.019 (2) (a) 11. of the statutes is repealed and recreated to 8read:AB1234,5,99118.019 (2) (a) 11. Online safety, digital literacy, and health literacy. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1234 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1234 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1234 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1234 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1234: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting